Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2114
State Electrical Division; provide training sessions; fee.

The State Electrical Division may provide training sessions for persons applying for licenses pursuant to the State Electrical Act, which sessions shall be held before each licensing examination is given. The purpose of the training sessions shall be to review electrical theory, current rules, regulations, codes, and laws pertaining to electricians, and other subjects deemed necessary by the division. The Electrical Division Fund shall be utilized in carrying out this section, and the attendance fee for one or more sessions shall be forty dollars. The division shall remit money collected under this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Electrical Division Fund.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-585;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB144, § 7.
July 19, 2024